Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.550

Sanctions.

The court may sanction a party if it finds that a proposal to relocate the child or an objection to an intended relocation or proposed revised residential schedule was made to harass a person, to interfere in bad faith with the relationship between the child and another person entitled to residential time or visitation with the child, or to unnecessarily delay or needlessly increase the cost of litigation.

[ 2000 c 21 s 17.]

NOTES:

Intent—Captions not law—2000 c 21: See notes following RCW 26.09.405.